Hawaii, session 2025, SB794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§171-    Immigration detention facility; prohibition.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department and board shall not dispose of or approve the use or setting aside of public lands for the establishment of any immigration detention facility. (b)  No state or county agency shall contract with the United States government for any purpose regarding the establishment of an immigration detention facility on public lands. (c)  For the purposes of this section, "immigration detention facility" means a facility to incarcerate individuals as they undergo deportation proceedings to determine whether the individuals will be deported or allowed to remain in the United States." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________